California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

20002.

(a) The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to any property, including vehicles, shall immediately stop the vehicle at the nearest location that will not impede traffic or otherwise jeopardize the safety of other motorists. Moving the vehicle in accordance with this subdivision does not affect the question of fault. The driver shall also immediately do either of the following:

(1) Locate and notify the owner or person in charge of that property of the name and address of the driver and owner of the vehicle involved and, upon locating the driver of any other vehicle involved or the owner or person in charge of any damaged property, upon being requested, present his or her driver’s license, and vehicle registration, to the other driver, property owner, or person in charge of that property. The information presented shall include the current residence address of the driver and of the registered owner. If the registered owner of an involved vehicle is present at the scene, he or she shall also, upon request, present his or her driver’s license information, if available, or other valid identification to the other involved parties.

(2) Leave in a conspicuous place on the vehicle or other property damaged a written notice giving the name and address of the driver and of the owner of the vehicle involved and a statement of the circumstances thereof and shall without unnecessary delay notify the police department of the city wherein the collision occurred or, if the collision occurred in unincorporated territory, the local headquarters of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) Any person who parks a vehicle which, prior to the vehicle again being driven, becomes a runaway vehicle and is involved in an accident resulting in damage to any property, attended or unattended, shall comply with the requirements of this section relating to notification and reporting and shall, upon conviction thereof, be liable to the penalties of this section for failure to comply with the requirements. 

(c) Any person failing to comply with all the requirements of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 825, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

20003.

(a) The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person shall also give his or her name, current residence address, the names and current residence addresses of any occupant of the driver’s vehicle injured in the accident, the registration number of the vehicle he or she is driving, and the name and current residence address of the owner to the person struck or the driver or occupants of any vehicle collided with, and shall give the information to any traffic or police officer at the scene of the accident. The driver also shall render to any person injured in the accident reasonable assistance, including transporting, or making arrangements for transporting, any injured person to a physician, surgeon, or hospital for medical or surgical treatment if it is apparent that treatment is necessary or if that transportation is requested by any injured person.

(b) Any driver or injured occupant of a driver’s vehicle subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) shall also, upon being requested, exhibit his or her driver’s license, if available, or, in the case of an injured occupant, any other available identification, to the person struck or to the driver or occupants of any vehicle collided with, and to any traffic or police officer at the scene of the accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20004.

In the event of death of any person resulting from an accident, the driver of any vehicle involved after fulfilling the requirements of this division, and if there be no traffic or police officer at the scene of the accident to whom to give the information required by Section 20003, shall, without delay, report the accident to the nearest office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or office of a duly authorized police authority and submit with the report the information required by Section 20003.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20006.

If the driver does not have his driver’s license in his possession, he shall exhibit other valid evidences of identification to the occupants of a vehicle with which he collided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20008.

(a) The driver of a vehicle, other than a common carrier vehicle, involved in any accident resulting in injuries to or death of any person shall within 24 hours after the accident make or cause to be made a written report of the accident to the Department of the California Highway Patrol or, if the accident occurred within a city, to either the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the police department of the city in which the accident occurred. If the agency which receives the report is not responsible for investigating the accident, it shall immediately forward the report to the law enforcement agency which is responsible for investigating the accident.

On or before the fifth day of each month, every police department which received a report during the previous calendar month of an accident which it is responsible for investigating shall forward the report or a copy thereof to the main office of the Department of the California Highway Patrol at Sacramento.

(b) The owner or driver of a common carrier vehicle involved in any such accident shall make a like report to the Department of California Highway Patrol on or before the 10th day of the month following the accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 224.)
-------------------------------------------

20009.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol may require any driver, or the owner of a common carrier vehicle, involved in any accident of which a report must be made as provided in Section 20008 to file supplemental reports and may require witnesses of accidents to render reports to it whenever the original report is insufficient in the opinion of such department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20010.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle is physically incapable of making a required accident report, any occupant in the vehicle at the time of the accident shall make the report or cause it to be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

20011.

A coroner or medical examiner shall on or before the 10th day of each month report in writing to the Department of the California Highway Patrol the death of any person during the preceding calendar month as the result of an accident involving a motor vehicle and the circumstances of the accident. Chemical test results, including blood alcohol content and blood drug concentrations, shall be reported in writing when available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.   (SB 925)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

20012.

All required accident reports, and supplemental reports, shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol, except that the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the law enforcement agency to whom the accident was reported shall disclose the entire contents of the reports, including, but not limited to, the names and addresses of persons involved or injured in, or witnesses to, an accident, the registration numbers and descriptions of vehicles involved, the date, time and location of an accident, all diagrams, statements of the drivers involved or occupants injured in the accident and the statements of all witnesses, to any person who may have a proper interest therein, including, but not limited to, the driver or drivers involved, or the guardian or conservator thereof, the parent of a minor driver, the authorized representative of a driver, or to any named person injured therein, the owners of vehicles or property damaged thereby, persons who may incur civil liability, including liability based upon a breach of warranty arising out of the accident, and any attorney who declares under penalty of perjury that he or she represents any of the above persons.

A request for a copy of an accident report shall be accompanied by payment of a fee, provided such fee shall not exceed the actual cost of providing the copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20013.

No such accident report shall be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of an accident, except that the department shall furnish upon demand of any person who has, or claims to have, made such a report or upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to the department solely to prove a compliance or failure to comply with the requirement that such a report be made to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20014.

All required accident reports and supplemental reports and all reports made to the Department of the California Highway Patrol by any peace officer, member of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or other employee of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall be immediately available for the confidential use of any division in the department needing the same, for confidential use of the Department of Transportation, and, with respect to accidents occurring on highways other than state highways, for the confidential use of the local authority having jurisdiction over the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

20015.

(a) No traffic or police officer shall include in any counter report of a property-damage accident, as defined in this section, any determination by the peace officer of fault of the reporting person, including, but not limited to, inattentiveness. This section does not apply to a determination which is the result of an examination of the physical evidence of the accident at the site of the accident by the traffic or police officer or the result of an express, knowing admission of the reporting person if the basis for the determination is also included in the report.

(b) As used in this section, “counter report of a property-damage accident” means any report of an accident involving one or more vehicles which meets the following criteria:

(1) The accident reported caused damage to property, but did not cause personal injury to or the death of any person.

(2) The report is prepared at an office of the California Highway Patrol or local law enforcement agency.

(3) The report is written or recorded by, or with the assistance of, a peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 861, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20016.

Any peace officer, any member of an organized fire department or fire protection district, any employee of the Department of Transportation assigned to maintenance operations, or any member of the California Highway Patrol may transport or arrange for the transportation of any person injured in an accident upon any highway to a physician and surgeon or hospital, if the injured person does not object to such transportation. Any officer, member, or employee exercising ordinary care and precaution shall not be liable for any damages due to any further injury or for any medical, ambulance, or hospital bills incurred in behalf of the injured party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

20017.

Any peace officer who knows, or has reasonable cause to believe, that a pesticide has been spilled or otherwise accidentally released, shall report the spill as required in Section 105215 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 425.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20018.

Every law enforcement agency having traffic law enforcement responsibility as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 830.1 and in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code may develop, adopt, and implement a written policy for its officers to provide assistance to disabled motorists on highways within its primary jurisdiction. A copy of the policy, if adopted, shall be available to the public upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 59, Sec. 18.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. RULES OF THE ROAD [21000. - 23336.]



CHAPTER 1. Obedience to and Effect of Traffic Laws [21000. - 21300.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [21000. - 21001.]

21000.

Wherever in this division “department” occurs, it means the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21001.

The provisions of this division refer exclusively to the operation of vehicles upon the highways, unless a different place is specifically referred to.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Effect of Traffic Laws [21050. - 21070.]

21050.

Every person riding or driving an animal upon a highway has all of the rights and is subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this division and Division 10 (commencing with Section 20000), except those provisions which by their very nature can have no application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 586.)
-------------------------------------------

21051.

The following sections apply to trolley coaches:

(a) Sections 1800, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4006, 4009, 4150, 4151, 4152, 4153, 4155, 4156, 4158, 4166, 4300 to 4309, inclusive, 4450 to 4454, inclusive, 4457, 4458, 4459, 4460, 4600 to 4610, inclusive, 4750, 4751, 4850, 4851, 4852, 4853, 5000, 5200 to 5205, inclusive, 5904, 6052, 8801, 9254, and 40001 with respect to 4000, relating to original and renewal of registration.

(b) Sections 9250, 9265, 9400, 9406, 9407, 9408, 9550, 9552, 9553, 9554, 9800 to 9808, inclusive, 14901, 42230 to 42233, inclusive, relating to registration and other fees.

(c) Sections 2800, 10851, 10852, 10853, 20001 to 20009, inclusive, 21052, 21053, 21054, 21450 to 21457, inclusive, 21461, 21650, 21651, 21658, 21659, 21700, 21701, 21702, 21703, 21709, 21712, 21750, 21753, 21754, 21755, 21800, 21801, 21802, 21806, 21950, 21951, 22106, 22107, 22108, 22109, 22350, 22351, 22352, 22400, 22450 to 22453, inclusive, 23103, 23104, 23105, 23110, 23152, 23153, 40831, 42002 with respect to 10852 and 10853, and 42004, relating to traffic laws.

(d) Sections 26706, 26707, and 26708, relating to equipment.

(e) Sections 17301, 17302, 17303, 21461, 35000, 35100, 35101, 35105, 35106, 35111, 35550, 35551, 35750, 35751, 35753, 40000.1 to 40000.25, inclusive, 40001, 40003, and 42031, relating to the size, weight, and loading of vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

21052.

The provisions of this code applicable to the drivers of vehicles upon the highways apply to the drivers of all vehicles while engaged in the course of employment by this State, any political subdivision thereof, any municipal corporation, or any district, including authorized emergency vehicles subject to those exemptions granted such authorized emergency vehicles in this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21053.

This code, except Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 10, Article 2 (commencing with Section 23152) of Chapter 12 of Division 11, and Sections 25268 and 25269, does not apply to public employees and publicly owned teams, motor vehicles, and other equipment while actually engaged in work upon the surface of a highway, or work of installation, removal, repairing, or maintaining official traffic control devices. This code does apply to those persons and vehicles when traveling to or from their work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

21054.

The provisions of this division do not apply to the duly authorized representatives of any public agency while actually engaged in performing any of the work described in Section 21053 but apply to such persons when traveling to and from such work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21055.

The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle is exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21350), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21650), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 21800), Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 21950), Chapter 6 (commencing with 22100), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 22348), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22450), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 22500), and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22650) of this division, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 38305) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 38312) of Chapter 5 of Division 16.5, under all of the following conditions:

(a) If the vehicle is being driven in response to an emergency call or while engaged in rescue operations or is being used in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law or is responding to, but not returning from, a fire alarm, except that fire department vehicles are exempt whether directly responding to an emergency call or operated from one place to another as rendered desirable or necessary by reason of an emergency call and operated to the scene of the emergency or operated from one fire station to another or to some other location by reason of the emergency call.

(b) If the driver of the vehicle sounds a siren as may be reasonably necessary and the vehicle displays a lighted red lamp visible from the front as a warning to other drivers and pedestrians.

A siren shall not be sounded by an authorized emergency vehicle except when required under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1017.)
-------------------------------------------

21056.

Section 21055 does not relieve the driver of a vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway, nor protect him from the consequences of an arbitrary exercise of the privileges granted in that section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21057.

Every police and traffic officer is hereby expressly prohibited from using a siren or driving at an illegal speed when serving as an escort of any vehicle, except when the escort or conveyance is furnished for the preservation of life or when expediting movements of supplies and personnel for any federal, state, or local governmental agency during a national emergency, or state of war emergency, or state of emergency, or local emergency as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 131.)
-------------------------------------------

21058.

A physician traveling in response to an emergency call shall be exempt from the provisions of Sections 22351 and 22352 if the vehicle so used by him displays an insigne approved by the department indicating that the vehicle is owned by a licensed physician. The provisions of this section do not relieve the driver of the vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway, nor protect the driver from the consequences of an arbitrary exercise of the privileges of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

21059.

Sections 21211, 21650, 21660, 22502, 22504, and subdivision (h) of Section 22500 do not apply to the operation of a rubbish or garbage truck while actually engaged in the collection of rubbish or garbage within a business or residence district, if the front turn signal lamps at each side of the vehicle are being flashed simultaneously and the rear turn signal lamps at each side of the vehicle are being flashed simultaneously.

This provision does not apply when the vehicle is being driven to and from work, and it does not relieve the driver of the vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway or protect him or her from the consequences of an arbitrary exercise of the privilege granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21060.

Between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m., Sections 21650, 21660, 22502, 22504, and subdivision (h) of Section 22500 do not apply to the operation of a streetsweeper vehicle or watering vehicle, operated by a local authority, while the vehicle is actually sweeping streets or watering landscaping or vegetation within a business or residence district. The exemption is not applicable unless the turn signal lamps at each side of the front and rear of the streetsweeper vehicle or watering vehicle are being flashed simultaneously.

This provision shall not apply when the vehicle is being driven to and from such work, nor does it relieve the driver of such a vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway or protect the driver from the consequences of an arbitrary exercise of the privilege granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 469.)
-------------------------------------------

21061.

(a) In addition to any action prescribed in Division 17 (commencing with Section 40000.1), a traffic officer may issue a notice of reexamination to any person who violates any provision of this division and who, at the time of the violation, exhibits evidence of incapacity to the traffic officer which leads the traffic officer to reasonably believe that the person is incapable of operating a motor vehicle in a manner so as not to present a clear or potential danger of risk of injury to that person or others if that person is permitted to resume operation of a motor vehicle.

(b) For purposes of this section, “evidence of incapacity” means evidence, other than violations of this division, of serious physical injury or illness or mental impairment or disorientation which is apparent to the traffic officer and which presents a clear or potential danger or risk of injury to the person or others if that person is permitted to resume operation of a motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 304, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

21062.

The arresting officer shall, before the end of the next working day, transmit, or cause to be transmitted, a legible copy of the notice of reexamination to the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the department shall enter the record of the notice in the driver’s license record maintained by electronic recording and storage media by the department within five working days of its receipt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 304, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 304.)
-------------------------------------------

21070.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a driver who violates any provision of this division, that is punishable as an infraction, and as a result of that violation proximately causes bodily injury or great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7 of the Penal Code, to another person is guilty of the public offense of unsafe operation of a motor vehicle with bodily injury or great bodily injury. That violation is punishable as an infraction pursuant to Section 42001.19.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 898, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Local Regulation [21100. - 21118.]

21100.

Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution regarding all of the following matters:

(a) Regulating or prohibiting a procession or assemblage on the highways.

(b) Licensing and regulating the operation of vehicles for hire and drivers of passenger vehicles for hire.

(c) Regulating traffic by means of traffic officers.

(d) Regulating traffic by means of official traffic control devices meeting the requirements of Section 21400.

(e) (1) Regulating traffic by means of a person given temporary or permanent appointment for that duty by the local authority when official traffic control devices are disabled or otherwise inoperable, at the scene of an accident or disaster, or at a location that may require traffic direction for orderly traffic flow.

(2) A person shall not be appointed pursuant to this subdivision unless and until the local authority has submitted to the commissioner or to the chief law enforcement officer exercising jurisdiction in the enforcement of traffic laws within the area in which the person is to perform the duty, for review, a proposed program of instruction for the training of a person for that duty and unless and until the commissioner or other chief law enforcement officer approves the proposed program. The commissioner or other chief
 law enforcement officer shall approve a proposed program if they reasonably determine that the program will provide sufficient training for persons assigned to perform the duty described in this subdivision.

(f) Regulating traffic at the site of road or street construction or maintenance by a person authorized for that duty by the local authority.

(g) (1) Licensing and regulating the operation of tow truck service or tow truck drivers whose principal place of business or employment is within the jurisdiction of the local authority, excepting the operation and operators of any auto dismantlers’ tow vehicle licensed under Section 11505 or any tow truck operated by a repossessing agency licensed under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of
 the Business and Professions Code and its registered employees.

(2) The Legislature finds that the safety and welfare of the general public is promoted by permitting local authorities to regulate tow truck service companies and operators by requiring licensure, insurance, and proper training in the safe operation of towing equipment, thereby ensuring against towing mistakes that may lead to violent confrontation, stranding motorists in dangerous situations, impeding the expedited vehicle recovery, and wasting state and local law enforcement’s limited resources.

(3) This subdivision does not limit the authority of a city or city and county pursuant to Section 12111.

(h) Operation of bicycles and, as specified in Section
 21114.5, electric carts by physically disabled persons or persons 50 years of age or older, on public sidewalks.

(i) Providing for the appointment of nonstudent school crossing guards for the protection of persons who are crossing a street or highway in the vicinity of a school or while returning thereafter to a place of safety.

(j) Regulating the methods of deposit of garbage and refuse in streets and highways for collection by the local authority or by any person authorized by the local authority.

(k) Regulating or authorizing the removal by peace officers of vehicles unlawfully parked in a fire lane, as described in Section 22500.1, on private property. A removal pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent,
 to the extent possible, with the procedures for removal and storage set forth in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22650).

(l) Regulating mobile billboard advertising displays, as defined in Section 395.5, including the establishment of penalties, which may include, but are not limited to, removal of the mobile billboard advertising display, civil penalties, and misdemeanor criminal penalties for a violation of the ordinance or resolution. The ordinance or resolution may establish a minimum distance that a mobile billboard advertising display shall be moved after a specified time period.

(m) Licensing and regulating the operation of pedicabs for hire, as defined in Section 467.5, and operators of pedicabs for hire, including requiring one or more of the following
 documents:

(1) A valid California driver’s license.

(2) Proof of successful completion of a bicycle safety training course certified by the League of American Bicyclists or an equivalent organization as determined by the local authority.

(3) A valid California identification card and proof of successful completion of the written portion of the California driver’s license examination administered by the department. The department shall administer, without charging a fee, the original driver’s license written examination on traffic laws and signs to a person who states that they are, or intend to become, a pedicab operator and who holds a valid California identification card or has successfully completed an application for a
 California identification card. If the person achieves a passing score on the examination, the department shall issue a certificate of successful completion of the examination bearing the person’s name and identification card number. The certificate shall not serve in lieu of successful completion of the required examination administered as part of any subsequent application for a driver’s license. The department is not required to enter the results of the examination into the computerized record of the person’s identification card or otherwise retain a record of the examination or results.

(n) (1) This section does not authorize a local authority to enact or enforce an ordinance or resolution that establishes a violation if a violation for the same or similar conduct is provided in this code, nor does it authorize a
 local authority to enact or enforce an ordinance or resolution that assesses a fine, penalty, assessment, or fee for a violation if a fine, penalty, assessment, or fee for a violation involving the same or similar conduct is provided in this code.

(2) This section does not preclude a local authority from enacting parking ordinances pursuant to existing authority in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 11.

(o) (1) Regulating advertising signs on motor vehicles parked or left standing upon a public street. The ordinance or resolution may establish a minimum distance that the advertising sign shall be moved after a specified time period.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to any of the
 following:

(A) Advertising signs that are permanently affixed to the body of, an integral part of, or a fixture of a motor vehicle for permanent decoration, identification, or display and that do not extend beyond the overall length, width, or height of the vehicle.

(B) If the license plate frame is installed in compliance with Section 5201, paper advertisements issued by a dealer contained within that license plate frame or any advertisements on that license plate frame.

(3) As used in paragraph (2), “permanently affixed” means any of the following:

(A) Painted directly on the body of a motor vehicle.

(B) Applied as a decal on the body of a motor vehicle.

(C) Placed in a location on the body of a motor vehicle that was specifically designed by a vehicle manufacturer, as defined in Section 672, and licensed pursuant to Section 11701, in compliance with both state and federal law or guidelines, for the express purpose of containing an advertising sign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (AB 436)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.1.

Whenever any city or county, by ordinance or resolution, permits, restricts, or prohibits the use of public or private highways pursuant to this article, any traffic control device erected by it on or after January 1, 1981, shall conform to the uniform standards and specifications adopted by the Department of Transportation pursuant to Section 21400.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 671, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.3.

It is unlawful for any person to disobey the traffic directions of a person appointed or authorized by a local authority to regulate traffic pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 21100 when such appointee is wearing an official insignia issued by the local authority and is acting in the course of his appointed duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.4.

(a) (1) A magistrate presented with the affidavit of a peace officer or a designated local transportation officer establishing reasonable cause to believe that a vehicle, described by vehicle type and license number, is being operated as a taxicab or other passenger vehicle for hire in violation of licensing requirements adopted by a local authority under subdivision (b) of Section 21100 shall issue a warrant or order authorizing the peace officer or designated local transportation officer to immediately seize and cause the removal of the vehicle. As used in this section, “designated local transportation officer” means any local public officer employed by a local authority to investigate and enforce local taxicab and vehicle for hire laws and regulations.

(2) The warrant or court order may be entered into a computerized database.

(3) A vehicle so impounded may be impounded for a period not to exceed 30 days.

(4) The impounding agency, within two working days of impoundment, shall send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the legal owner of the vehicle, at an address obtained from the department, informing the owner that the vehicle has been impounded and providing the owner with a copy of the warrant or court order. Failure to notify the legal owner within two working days shall prohibit the impounding agency from charging for more than 15 days’ impoundment when a legal owner redeems the impounded vehicle. The law enforcement agency shall be open to issue a release to the registered owner or legal owner, or the agent of either, whenever the agency is
 open to serve the public for regular, nonemergency business.

(b) (1) An impounding agency shall release a vehicle to the registered owner or his or her agent prior to the end of the impoundment period and without the permission of the magistrate authorizing the vehicle’s seizure under any of the following circumstances:

(A) When the vehicle is a stolen vehicle.

(B) When the vehicle was seized under this section for an offense that does not authorize the seizure of the vehicle.

(C) When the vehicle is a rental car.

(2) A vehicle may not be released under this subdivision, except upon presentation of the registered owner’s or agent’s currently valid license to operate
 the vehicle under the licensing requirements adopted by the local authority under subdivision (b) of Section 21100, and proof of current vehicle registration, or upon order of the court.

(c) (1) Whenever a vehicle is impounded under this section, the magistrate ordering the storage shall provide the vehicle’s registered and legal owners of record, or their agents, with the opportunity for a poststorage hearing to determine the validity of the storage.

(2) A notice of the storage shall be mailed or personally delivered to the registered and legal owners within 48 hours after issuance of the warrant or court order, excluding weekends and holidays, by the person or agency executing the warrant or court order, and shall include all of the following information:

(A) The name, address, and telephone
 number of the agency providing the notice.

(B) The location of the place of storage and a description of the vehicle, which shall include, if available, the name or make, the manufacturer, the license plate number, and the mileage of the vehicle.

(C) A copy of the warrant or court order and the peace officer’s affidavit, as described in subdivision (a).

(D) A statement that, in order to receive their poststorage hearing, the owners, or their agents, are required to request the hearing from the magistrate issuing the warrant or court order in person, in writing, or by telephone, within 10 days of the date of the notice.

(3) The poststorage hearing shall be conducted within two court days after receipt of the request for the hearing.

(4) At the hearing, the magistrate may order the vehicle released if he or she finds any of the circumstances described in subdivision (b) or (e) that allow release of a vehicle by the impounding agency.

(5) Failure of either the registered or legal owner, or his or her agent, to request, or to attend, a scheduled hearing satisfies the poststorage hearing requirement.

(6) The agency employing the peace officer or designated local transportation officer who caused the magistrate to issue the warrant or court order shall be responsible for the costs incurred for towing and storage if it is determined in the poststorage hearing that reasonable grounds for the storage are not established.

(d) The registered owner or his or her agent is responsible for all
 towing and storage charges related to the impoundment, and any administrative charges authorized under Section 22850.5.

(e) A vehicle removed and seized under subdivision (a) shall be released to the legal owner of the vehicle or the legal owner’s agent prior to the end of the impoundment period and without the permission of the magistrate authorizing the seizure of the vehicle if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The legal owner is a motor vehicle dealer, bank, credit union, acceptance corporation, or other licensed financial institution legally operating in this state or is another person, not the registered owner, holding a security interest in the vehicle.

(2) (A) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent pays all towing and storage fees related to the seizure of the vehicle. A
 lien sale processing fee shall not be charged to the legal owner who redeems the vehicle prior to the 15th day of impoundment. Neither the impounding authority nor any person having possession of the vehicle shall collect from the legal owner of the type specified in paragraph (1), or the legal owner’s agent, any administrative charges imposed pursuant to Section 22850.5 unless the legal owner voluntarily requested a poststorage hearing.

(B) A person operating or in charge of a storage facility where vehicles are stored pursuant to this section shall accept a valid bank credit card or cash for payment of towing, storage, and related fees by a legal or registered owner or the owner’s agent claiming the vehicle. A credit card shall be in the name of the person presenting the card. “Credit card” means “credit card” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1747.02 of the Civil Code, except, for the purposes of this section, credit card does not
 include a credit card issued by a retail seller.
